New York, session 2025-2026, A5628.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 80.00 of the penal law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. When a court imposes a fine on a defendant pursuant to section 4 215.51 of this chapter, and where such defendant has wilfully committed 5 such crime persistently and/or egregiously as determined by the court, 6 the amount of the fine specified in paragraph a of subdivision one of 7 this section may be increased to a total amount of up to one hundred 8 fifty thousand dollars. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 11 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 12 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 13 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06681-01-5